Wyoming statutes. Title 3 Guardian and Ward
Article 8. Gifts

§ 3-3-801.
Conservator may make gifts.

For good cause shown and under order of court, a conservator may make gifts on behalf of the ward out of the assets of the ward to persons or religious, educational, scientific, charitable or other nonprofit organizations to whom or to which gifts were regularly made prior to the appointment of the conservator. The making of gifts from the assets of the ward shall not foreseeably impair the ability to provide adequately for the best interests of the ward.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.